Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 5.4 Division of Mental Health

40.1-5.4-1.
Mental health services.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be required to plan, develop, coordinate, and administer a complete, comprehensive, and integrated statewide system of mental health services. The department shall take cognizance of all matters affecting the mental health of the residents of the state, including those in the general population who require periodic, short-term therapeutic services as well as those with serious mental illness. Notwithstanding that, the department’s highest priorities shall be to provide services to residents with serious mental illness; early and ongoing treatment and support for individuals with serious mental illness; and research into the cause and treatment of serious mental illness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-2.
Division of mental health.

Within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, a division of integrated mental health services shall be established to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-3.
Control and maintenance of state-operated facilities.

The maintenance, management, and control of state-operated facilities for persons with serious mental illness shall be the responsibility of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-4.
Powers and duties of director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall, subject to available appropriations, have the following powers and duties:

To be responsible for planning and developing a complete, comprehensive, and integrated statewide system of mental health services; provided that the department’s highest priorities shall be to provide services to residents with serious mental illness, early and ongoing treatment and support for serious mental illness and research into the causes and treatment of serious mental illness, in the development of the system, the department shall consult with all facilities and agencies, both public and private, concerned with the mental health of the residents of Rhode Island;

To implement the system in cooperation with providers of mental health services;

To coordinate the efforts of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals with those of other state departments and agencies, municipal governments, as well as the federal government and private agencies concerned with, and providing services for, persons with serious mental illness;

To be responsible for the administration of state-operated facilities established for the diagnosis, care, and rehabilitation of adults with serious mental illness and to ensure that there are adequate state facilities to provide these services;

To have general supervision of all private facilities as that term is defined in §

40.1-5-2(5)

and to exercise the powers and duties provided for in §

40.1-5-1

et seq.;

To establish standards in conformance with generally accepted professional practice and to provide technical assistance to all state-supported diagnostic facilities, rehabilitation centers, community residences, community mental health centers, and other facilities for the persons with serious mental illness licensed by the department pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq.;

To monitor and inspect to ensure compliance with the standards; provided, however, that none of the foregoing shall be applicable to any of the facilities wholly within the control of any other department of state government;

To stimulate research by public and private agencies, institutions of higher learning, and hospitals, in the interest of the elimination and amelioration of serious mental illness, and care and treatment of persons with serious mental illness;

To provide funding to the various community agencies and private nonprofit agencies, in amounts that will enable adults with serious mental illness to receive services appropriate to their individual needs;

To take, hold, and administer in trust for the state any grant, devise, gift, or bequest made either to the state or to the department for the use of persons under its care or for the expenditure upon any work that the department is authorized to undertake;

To establish and maintain a comprehensive program of community mental health services, utilizing the community mental health centers and other community mental health agencies and to establish standards for the development of these community programs;

To exercise the powers and duties relating to community mental health centers in accordance with §

40.1-8.5-1

et seq.;

To exercise the powers and duties relating to the licensing of community mental health facilities in accordance with §

40.1-24-1

et seq.;

To consult with and assist the governor’s council on behavioral health in accordance with the requirements of chapter 29 of this title;

To exercise the powers and duties relating to care and treatment of forensic patients in accordance with §

40.1-5.3-1

et seq.;

To cooperate with the department of corrections, the courts, and local and state law enforcement authorities to ensure adequate, fair, and humane treatment of persons with serious mental illness involved in the criminal justice system;

To initiate transition planning:

In cooperation with the department of children, youth and families and local school departments, for any person who receives services through the department of children, youth and families, is seriously emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed pursuant to §

42-72-5(b)(24)(v)

, and whose care may or shall be administered by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals after the age of twenty-one (21) years, the transition planning shall commence at least twelve (12) months prior to the child’s twenty-first birthday and shall result in a collaborative plan submitted to the family court by both behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and the department of children, youth and families and shall require the approval of the court prior to the dismissal of the abuse, neglect, dependency, or miscellaneous petition;

In cooperation with the individual, the parents/legal guardians and school districts for any other person whose care may or shall be administered by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals after the age of twenty-one (21) years, the transition planning shall commence at least twelve (12) months prior to the child’s twenty-first birthday and shall specifically identify housing options, supportive services, health care, and workforce training or opportunities;

To act in the capacity of “state mental health authority” as that term has meaning for a coordination of state mental health planning and policy, and as it also relates to requirements set forth in pertinent federal mental health laws and regulations;

To propose, review, and/or approve, as appropriate, proposals, policies, or plans involving insurance or managed care systems for mental health services in Rhode Island or those aimed at improving the overall mental health of Rhode Island residents when the proposals, policies or plans relate to the publicly administered integrated state mental health service system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 118, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 130, § 2.

40.1-5.4-5.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

To advance the public interest, to promote, safeguard and protect the human dignity, constitutional and statutory rights and liberties, social well-being and general welfare of all residents with serious mental illness of the state;

To provide or to secure certain social, protective, supportive, rehabilitative, emergency, and other types of appropriate services for adults with serious mental illness;

To establish, maintain and coordinate a comprehensive, effective, and efficient system of services for persons with serious mental illness;

To promote the coordination of all available services, both general and specialized, for adults with serious mental illness, under public and private auspices; and

To ensure that adults with serious mental illness who receive services from agencies or facilities licensed by the department pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq., receive psychiatric, social, rehabilitative, housing assistance, and case-management services as prescribed in an individualized treatment plan, developed with the participation of the adult with serious mental illness, and when possible, his or her family or guardian or interested friend.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-6.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state to provide persons with serious mental illness adequate and humane care, that, to the extent possible, while meeting the purposes of rehabilitation and treatment, is:

Within each person’s own community, recognizing that some services are appropriately provided in facilities that provide services to the entire state;

Least restrictive of the person’s freedom of movement and ability to function normally in society while being appropriate to the person’s individual capacity and needs;

Directed toward eliminating the need for services and promoting the person’s independence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-7.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Adult with serious mental illness” means a person with serious mental illness, eighteen (18) years or older and not under the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth and families.

“Case management” means the services provided by mental health staff for the purpose of monitoring and assisting clients in their overall life situations, including gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, residential, vocational, and other services necessary to meeting basic human needs. These services may include, but are not necessarily limited to:

Maintaining assessments and evaluations necessary for establishing eligibility of services;

Participation in the treatment planning process and monitoring client progress in meeting the goals and objectives of the plan;

Locating, monitoring, and coordinating all necessary medical, social, psychiatric, and residential services;

Assisting in the development of appropriate social networks;

Assistance with other activities necessary to maintain psychiatric stability in a community-based setting.

“Community mental health centers” means the eight (8) private, nonprofit agencies established pursuant to §

40.1-8.5-1

et seq.

“Community support program” means a program of services, including case-management services, supports, and treatment that allow adults with serious mental illness to function effectively in the community.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Diagnosis and evaluation” means a process to determine whether and to what extent an individual has a serious mental illness and a study of the individual’s condition, situation, and needs that lead to a recommendation of what services, if any, would benefit the individual.

“Emergency services” means crisis intervention services available on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven-day-a-week (7) basis; the intervention shall include screening and evaluation of the need for inpatient or outpatient treatment and admission to such services, as appropriate.

“Individualized treatment plan” means a written plan, however named, that includes, but shall not be limited to, the following:

An evaluation of the strengths, difficulties, needs, and goals of the individual;

A description of those services, including supportive, rehabilitative, housing assistance, and case-management services, found to be necessary or appropriate to assist the individual in realizing his or her potential for self-sufficiency in major life activities and in moving towards recovery;

A description of the agencies and/or individuals, who or that are proposed to provide each of the recommended services;

The intermediate and long-range objectives for the individual’s rehabilitation and well-being;

The expected duration for the provision of each of the services;

A description of the tests and other evaluative devices used and their results;

Proposed criteria for monitoring and evaluating the success of the services in meeting the individual’s needs; and

The signatures of the preparers of the plan and the date the plan was prepared. This plan shall be reviewed at least annually.

“Rehabilitative services” means and includes, but shall not be limited to, medication supervision and maintenance, counseling, day-treatment programs, clinical services, vocational, and psychiatric services.

“Serious mental illness” means an illness which is biologically based, severe in degree, and persistent in duration, which causes a substantially diminished level of functioning in the primary aspects of daily living and an inability to cope with the ordinary demands of life, which may lead to an inability to maintain stable adjustment and independent functioning without long-term treatment and support and which may be of lifetime duration. Serious mental illness includes schizophrenia, bipolar disorders, as well as a spectrum of psychotic and other severely disabling psychiatric diagnostic categories, but does not include infirmities of aging or a primary diagnosis of mental retardation, alcohol or drug abuse, or anti-social behavior.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-8.
Admission to mental health services.

Persons with serious mental health illness shall be admitted for mental health services under the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the following procedures:

Any person seeking services from the publicly administered integrated state mental health service system may apply to an approved community mental health program. A parent, guardian, relative, or interested friend of the person may request services from an approved community mental health program.

After the initial diagnosis and evaluation is completed:

A determination will be made regarding whether the person has a serious mental illness, and if so, what level of services is initially indicated;

An individualized treatment plan for each person shall be established that shall include services that are necessary and appropriate to the person’s condition of serious mental illness;

Every effort shall be made to involve the person with serious mental illness, his or her guardian, parent, relative, or interested friend in the creation of the individualized treatment plan; and

Each person and his or her guardian shall, upon request, be offered a written copy of an approved individualized treatment plan developed for the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-9.
Authority to lease.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

42-11-2

, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may make available, on terms and conditions and for the period it deems proper, facilities under its jurisdiction, or space therein, to affiliating nonprofit agencies, provided that the premises are utilized for direct or supportive services to persons who are mentally ill and their families, and/or for education and training of any discipline concerned with the problems of serious mental illness and/or research directed to the problems of serious mental illness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 107; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 107.

40.1-5.4-10.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it deems necessary to enable the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to provide or secure services for adults with serious mental illness; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or sums or so much thereof as may be required, from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of vouchers properly authenticated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-11.
Rules and regulations.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, after consultation with agencies and individuals knowledgeable about and concerned with persons with serious mental illness, shall make and promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to services for persons with serious mental illness as specified in this chapter when the services are provided in whole or in part by the use of state and/or federal funds earmarked for persons with serious mental illness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.

40.1-5.4-12.
Other obligations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any agency, state or local, from its obligations to provide services to individuals with serious mental illness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 247, § 1.